South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3860.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-130-60 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (E) Every first responder station and dispatch office in the State shall maintain in their inventory an adequate supply of unexpired opioid antidote medication for use in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----